Hawaii statutes.
[§196-67] Hawaii green
infrastructure bond fund. (a) There is established the Hawaii green
infrastructure bond fund as a special fund into which all proceeds of the green
infrastructure fee established pursuant to section 269-166 and any other
proceeds of green infrastructure property shall be paid. The
Hawaii green infrastructure bond fund may also receive
other moneys as the department may determine and as provided in a financing order, including, without limitation, green
infrastructure charges.

(b) Moneys in the Hawaii green infrastructure bond fund shall be impressed with the lien
created by, and shall be used solely for purposes set forth in, section 269-164. Upon payment or
defeasance of all bonds and financing costs, moneys in the fund, at the direction of the department, may be transferred into
the Hawaii green infrastructure special fund established
pursuant to section 196-65 or other purpose as the department
shall specify.

(c) The Hawaii green infrastructure bond fund shall be audited at least annually
by a firm of independent certified public accountants selected by the
department, and the results of this audit shall be provided to the department
and the public utilities commission.

(d) Pursuant to section
39-68, the department shall appoint a trustee to receive, hold, and disburse all amounts required to be held in the Hawaii green infrastructure bond fund upon terms and conditions as set
forth in a certificate, indenture, or trust agreement.

The Hawaii green
infrastructure bond fund shall not be subject to section 37-53. [L 2013, c 211,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next